Utah statutes.
31A-27a-208.   Entry of order.
(1)  If the commissioner establishes any of the grounds provided in Section
31A-27a-207, the receivership court shall:
(a)  grant the petition; and
(b)  issue the order of rehabilitation or liquidation requested in the
petition.
(2)  Upon the issuance of the order, the commissioner shall forward a copy of
the order by first-class mail or electronic communication as permitted by the
receivership court to the commissioners and guaranty associations in states in
which the insurer did business.
